Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2683.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 46, chapter 2, article 2, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 46-232, to read: START_STATUTE46-232. Emergency food assistance fund; supplemental nutrition assistance program; federal government shutdown; temporary monies A. The emergency food assistance fund is established consisting of legislative appropriations.  The department shall administer the fund.  Monies in the fund are CONTINUOUSLY appropriated and are exempt from the provisions of section 35-190 relating to lapsing of appropriations. B. The department shall use monies from the fund for the purposes of the supplemental nutrition assistance program only when the federal government is shutdown or otherwise unable to provide monies for the supplemental nutrition assistance program and may also use monies from the fund to provide: 1. Temporary food vouchers, electronic benefits or direct assistance to households that are not eligible for the supplemental nutrition assistance program. 2. Grants to good banks, food pantries and community-based hunger relief organizations to expand emergency food distribution. Sec. 2. Appropriation; emergency food assistance fund The sum of $5,000,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the emergency food assistance fund established by section 46-232, Arizona Revised Statutes, as added by this act. END_STATUTE